Hawaii statutes.
§338-12 Evidentiary character of
certificates. Certificates filed within thirty days after the time
prescribed therefor shall be prima facie evidence of the facts therein stated.
Data pertaining to the father of a child is prima facie evidence if:

(1) The alleged father is:

(A) The husband of the mother; or

(B) The acknowledged father of the child; or

(2) The father and child relationship has been
established under chapter 584. Data pertaining to the alleged father
acknowledging paternity of the child is admissible as evidence of paternity in
any family court proceeding, including proceedings under chapter 584. [L 1949,
c 327, §16; RL 1955, §57-15; HRS §338-12; am L 1975, c 66, §2(2); am L 1994, c
23, §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next